tests/nouns.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../wal.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../wal.automorf.hfst

Tests:
 "noun kan":
    kan<n><masc><noncon><abs> : kana
    kan<n><masc><noncon><obl> : kana
    kan<n><masc><noncon><nom> : kani
    kan<n><masc><noncon><inter> : kanee
    kan<n><masc><noncon><voc> : kanoo
    kan<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : kanaa
    kan<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : kanaa
    kan<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : kanai
    kan<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : kanai
    kan<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : kanau
    kan<n><masc><con><plr><abs> : kanata
    kan<n><masc><con><plr><obl> : kanatu
    kan<n><masc><con><plr><nom> : kanati
    kan<n><masc><con><plr><inter> : kanatee
    kan<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : kanatoo

 "noun Hidaar":

   Hidaar<n><masc><noncon><nom> : Hidaaree
   Hidaar<n><masc><noncon><obl> : Hidaare
   Hidaar<n><masc><noncon><voc> : Hidaaree

 "noun tuus":  
   tuus<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : tuusaa
   tuus<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : tuusaw
   tuus<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : tuusay
   tuus<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : tuusay
   tuus<n><masc><noncon><abs> : tuusa
   tuus<n><masc><noncon><obl> : tuusa
   tuus<n><masc><noncon><inter> : tuusee

 "noun udunxx":
   udunxx<n><masc><con><plr><abs> : udunxxeta
   udunxx<n><masc><con><plr><inter> : udunxxetee
   udunxx<n><masc><con><plr><nom> : udunxxeti
   udunxx<n><masc><con><plr><obl> : udunxxetu
   udunxx<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : udunxxetoo
   udunxx<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : udunxxee
   udunxx<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : udunxxee
   udunxx<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : udunxxiya
   udunxx<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : udunxxiya
   udunxx<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : udunxxiyaw
   udunxx<n><masc><noncon><abs> : udunxxe
   udunxx<n><masc><noncon><inter> : udunxxee
   udunxx<n><masc><noncon><nom> : udunxxee

 "noun Abash":
    Abash<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Abashay
    Abash<n><masc><noncon><abs> : Abasha
    Abash<n><masc><noncon><obl> : Abasha
    Abash<n><masc><noncon><inter> : Abashee
    Abash<n><masc><noncon><nom> : Abashi
    Abash<n><masc><noncon><voc> : Abashoo

 "noun Bullaal":
    Bullaal<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : Bullaalaw
    Bullaal<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : Bullaalay
    Bullaal<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Bullaalay
    Bullaal<n><masc><noncon><abs> : Bullaala
    Bullaal<n><masc><noncon><obl> : Bullaala
    Bullaal<n><masc><noncon><inter> : Bullaalee
    Bullaal<n><masc><noncon><nom> : Bullaali

 "gaxar":
    gaxar<n><masc><con><plr><nom> : gaxareti
    gaxar<n><masc><con><plr><obl> : gaxaretu
    gaxar<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : gaxaretoo
    gaxar<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : gaxaree
    gaxar<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : gaxaree
    gaxar<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : gaxariya
    gaxar<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : gaxariya
    gaxar<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : gaxariyaw
    gaxar<n><masc><noncon><abs> : gaxare
    gaxar<n><masc><noncon><inter> : gaxaree
    gaxar<n><masc><noncon><nom> : gaxaree
    gaxar<n><masc><noncon><obl> : gaxare
    gaxar<n><masc><noncon><voc> : gaxaree

 "noun Giriik":
    Giriik<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : Giriikee
    Giriik<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Giriikee
    Giriik<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : Giriikiya
    Giriik<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : Giriikiya
    Giriik<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : Giriikiyaw
    Giriik<n><masc><noncon><abs> : Giriike

 "noun Hamil":
    Hamil<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : Hamilee
    Hamil<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Hamilee
    Hamil<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : Hamiliya
    Hamil<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : Hamiliya
    Hamil<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : Hamiliyaw
    Hamil<n><masc><noncon><abs> : Hamile
    Hamil<n><masc><noncon><inter> : Hamilee
    Hamil<n><masc><noncon><nom> : Hamilee
    Hamil<n><masc><noncon><obl> : Hamile
    Hamil<n><masc><noncon><voc> : Hamilee
    Hamil<n><masc><noncon><voc> : Hamiloo
    Hamuus<n><masc><con><plr><abs> : Hamuusata
    Hamuus<n><masc><con><plr><inter> : Hamuusatee
    Hamuus<n><masc><con><plr><nom> : Hamuusati
    Hamuus<n><masc><con><plr><obl> : Hamuusatu
    Hamuus<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : Hamuusatoo
    Hamuus<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : Hamuusaa
    Hamuus<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : Hamuusaa

 "noun Isiin":
    Isiin<n><masc><noncon><obl> : Isiine
    Isiin<n><masc><noncon><voc> : Isiinee
    Isiin<n><masc><noncon><voc> : Isiinoo

 "noun Jaapaan":
    Jaapaan<n><masc><con><plr><abs> : Jaapaaneta

 "noun Kuushs":
    Kuushs<n><masc><noncon><voc> : Kuushsoo

 "noun Laappun":
    Laappun<n><masc><con><plr><abs> : Laappuneta
    Laappun<n><masc><con><plr><inter> : Laappunetee
    Laappun<n><masc><con><plr><nom> : Laappuneti
    Laappun<n><masc><con><plr><obl> : Laappunetu
    Laappun<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : Laappunetoo

 "noun Toophph":
    Toophph<n><masc><con><plr><abs> : Toophpheta
    Toophph<n><masc><con><plr><inter> : Toophphetee
    Toophph<n><masc><con><plr><nom> : Toophpheti
    Toophph<n><masc><con><plr><obl> : Toophphetu
    Toophph<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : Toophphetoo
    Toophph<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : Toophphee
    Toophph<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Toophphee
    Toophph<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : Toophphiya
    Toophph<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : Toophphiya
    Toophph<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : Toophphiyaw
    Toophph<n><masc><noncon><abs> : Toophphe
    Toophph<n><masc><noncon><inter> : Toophphee
    Toophph<n><masc><noncon><nom> : Toophphee
    Toophph<n><masc><noncon><obl> : Toophphe

 "noun Usuppun":
    Usuppun<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : Usuppunetoo
    Usuppun<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : Usuppunee
    Usuppun<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Usuppunee

 "noun Wolayttatt":
    Wolayttatt<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Wolayttattoy
    Wolayttatt<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : Wolayttattuwa
    Wolayttatt<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : Wolayttattuwa
    Wolayttatt<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : Wolayttattuwaw
    Wolayttatt<n><masc><noncon><abs> : Wolayttatto
    Wolayttatt<n><masc><noncon><inter> : Wolayttattoo

 "noun Xoos":
    Xoos<n><masc><con><plr><voc> : Xoosatoo
    Xoos<n><masc><con><sing><abs> : Xoosaa
    Xoos<n><masc><con><sing><obl> : Xoosaa
    Xoos<n><masc><con><sing><voc> : Xoosaw
    Xoos<n><masc><con><sing><inter> : Xoosay
    Xoos<n><masc><con><sing><nom> : Xoosay
    Xoos<n><masc><noncon><abs> : Xoosa
    Xoos<n><masc><noncon><obl> : Xoosa
    Xoos<n><masc><noncon><inter> : Xoosee
